test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Slex_cissaas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - cissááš: # MLO, ok; short vowel in the 1st syll (comp to vuálááš)
    cissááš+N+Sg+Nom: cissááš
    cissááš+N+Sg+Gen: cissáá
    cissááš+N+Sg+Acc: cissáá
    cissááš+N+Sg+Ill: cissáážân
    cissááš+N+Sg+Loc: cissáást
    cissááš+N+Sg+Com: cissáin
    cissááš+N+Sg+Abe: cissááttáá
    cissááš+N+Ess: cissáážin
    cissááš+N+Par: cissáážid
    cissááš+N+Pl+Nom: cissááh
    cissááš+N+Pl+Gen: cissái
    cissááš+N+Pl+Acc: cissáid
    cissááš+N+Pl+Ill: cissáid
    cissááš+N+Pl+Loc: cissáin
    cissááš+N+Pl+Com: [cissáiguin, cissáigijn]
    cissááš+N+Pl+Abe: cissáittáá

  Noun - loddááš: # MLO, ok
    loddááš+N+Sg+Nom: loddááš
    loddááš+N+Sg+Gen: loddáá
    loddááš+N+Sg+Acc: loddáá
    loddááš+N+Sg+Ill: loddáážân
    loddááš+N+Sg+Loc: loddáást
    loddááš+N+Sg+Com: loddáin
    loddááš+N+Sg+Abe: loddááttáá
    loddááš+N+Ess: loddáážin
    loddááš+N+Par: loddáážid
    loddááš+N+Pl+Nom: loddááh
    loddááš+N+Pl+Gen: loddái
    loddááš+N+Pl+Acc: loddáid
    loddááš+N+Pl+Ill: loddáid
    loddááš+N+Pl+Loc: loddáin
    loddááš+N+Pl+Com: [loddáiguin, loddáigijn]
    loddááš+N+Pl+Abe: loddáittáá
 
  Noun - tuvvááš: # MLO, ok
    tuvvááš+N+Sg+Nom: tuvvááš
    tuvvááš+N+Sg+Gen: tuvváá
    tuvvááš+N+Sg+Acc: tuvváá
    tuvvááš+N+Sg+Ill: tuvváážân
    tuvvááš+N+Sg+Loc: tuvváást
    tuvvááš+N+Sg+Com: tuvváin
    tuvvááš+N+Sg+Abe: tuvvááttáá
    tuvvááš+N+Ess: tuvváážin
    tuvvááš+N+Par: tuvváážid
    tuvvááš+N+Pl+Nom: tuvvááh
    tuvvááš+N+Pl+Gen: tuvvái
    tuvvááš+N+Pl+Acc: tuvváid
    tuvvááš+N+Pl+Ill: tuvváid
    tuvvááš+N+Pl+Loc: tuvváin
    tuvvááš+N+Pl+Com: [tuvváiguin, tuvváigijn]
    tuvvááš+N+Pl+Abe: tuvváittáá
 
  Noun - tirlihhááš: # MLO, ok
    tirlihhááš+N+Sg+Nom: tirlihhááš
    tirlihhááš+N+Sg+Gen: tirlihháá
    tirlihhááš+N+Sg+Acc: tirlihháá
    tirlihhááš+N+Sg+Ill: tirlihháážân
    tirlihhááš+N+Sg+Loc: tirlihháást
    tirlihhááš+N+Sg+Com: tirlihháin
    tirlihhááš+N+Sg+Abe: tirlihhááttáá
    tirlihhááš+N+Ess: tirlihháážin
    tirlihhááš+N+Par: tirlihháážid
    tirlihhááš+N+Pl+Nom: tirlihhááh
    tirlihhááš+N+Pl+Gen: tirlihhái
    tirlihhááš+N+Pl+Acc: tirlihháid
    tirlihhááš+N+Pl+Ill: tirlihháid
    tirlihhááš+N+Pl+Loc: tirlihháin
    tirlihhááš+N+Pl+Com: [tirlihháiguin, tirlihháigijn]
    tirlihhááš+N+Pl+Abe: tirlihháittáá


   
